Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.110

Return of proceedings by sheriff.

The sheriff shall file a return of proceedings with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending within twenty days after taking possession of the property.

[ 1990 c 227 s 8; 1891 c 34 s 1; Code 1881 s 152; 1877 p 32 s 152; 1869 p 38 s 150; 1854 p 152 s 110; RRS s 717.]